Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3309
Indirect supervision, defined.

Indirect supervision means that the supervisor is not on the premises but is easily accessible and has given written or oral instructions for treatment of the animal and the animal has been examined by a veterinarian at such times as acceptable veterinary practice requires consistent with the particular delegated animal health care task.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1091.